Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3507
Direct supervision, defined.

Direct supervision means having professional knowledge relating to and control over the work of another person that constitutes the practice of geology.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 5.